Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section and sections 2 and 3 of this 2022 Act:
(a) “Bidder” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(b) “Covered materials” means:
(A) Concrete, including ready mix concrete, shotcrete, precast concrete  and concrete
masonry units;
(B) Asphalt paving mixtures;
(C) Steel, including rebar, reinforcing  steel and structural steel, hot-rolled sections, hol-
low sections, plate steel and cold-formed steel; and
(D) Other materials the Department of Transportation designates by  rule after consul-
tation with the technical advisory committee.
(c) “Emergency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(d) “Environmental  product declaration” means a product-specific label developed in ac-
cordance with rules the department adopts that are based on ISO Standard 14025 and on  in-
dependently verified life cycle assessment data, life cycle inventory and  analysis data or
information modules in accordance with the ISO 14040 series of standards.
(e) “Procurement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(f) “Proposer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(g) “Public contract” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(h) “Public Contracting Code” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
(i) “Technical advisory committee” means the  committee described in section 2 of this
2022 Act.
(2)(a) The department, not later than December 31, 2025,  shall establish a program for
greenhouse gas reduction that:
(A) Assesses the greenhouse gas emissions attributable to covered materials the depart-
ment uses in the department’s construction  and maintenance activities for the state’s
transportation system;
(B) Conducts life cycle assessments of a selected set of the department’s construction
and maintenance activities; and
Enrolled House Bill 4139 (HB 4139-B) Page 1
(C) Devises strategies for  reducing greenhouse gas emissions that include, but are not
limited to, improving pavement and bridge conditions.
(b) In establishing the program described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the de-
partment shall identify and disclose in any reports the department  produces all relevant
measurement difficulties, deficiencies in needed data,  assumptions, uncertainties, techno-
logical limitations, costs  associated with assessment and implementation and any other rel-
evant limitations of methodology, practice or implementation.
(c) In devising the strategies described in paragraph (a)(C) of this subsection, the de-
partment, at a minimum, shall consider and evaluate:
(A) Advancements in materials and engineering as applied to  greenhouse gas emission
reduction;
(B) Regional variability in the quality and  durability of aggregates and other components
of covered materials;
(C) The types and effects of fuels available  for use in manufacturing, transporting and
using covered materials;
(D) The quality and performance of the covered materials; and
(E) Any other factors that the department, in consultation with  the technical advisory
committee, deems relevant and useful.
(d) The department shall conduct the assessments and devise the strategies described  in
paragraph (a) of this subsection separately for each of the state’s five transportation regions,
accounting for differences among the regions with respect to the availability of covered ma-
terials, fuel and  other necessary resources and the quantity of covered materials the de-
partment uses or plans to use.
(3)(a) In procuring covered materials for the program described in subsection  (2)(a) of
this section, the department  shall require contractors to submit environmental product
declarations before the contractor installs the covered materials, unless the department:
(A) Procures the covered materials on an emergency basis;
(B) Determines that a relevant product category rule does not exist;
(C) Determines that requiring an environmental  product declaration will reduce compe-
tition for public  contracts or otherwise contravene the requirements of the Public Con-
tracting Code;
(D) Determines that requiring an environmental product  declaration would unreasonably
affect the department’s specifications or requirements for covered  materials or impair the
department’s construction or maintenance activities;
(E) Determines that an environmental product declaration is  not necessary to measure
or quantify greenhouse gas emissions; or
(F) Determines after consultation with  the technical advisory committee that other
considerations outweigh the need for  requiring environmental product declarations or that
a construction  or maintenance activity would use less than a threshold amount of covered
materials. The department, in consultation with the technical advisory  committee, shall
specify the threshold amount by rule.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, in  procuring asphalt paving mix-
tures, the  department may allow contractors to submit environmental product declarations
within a reasonable time after executing a public contract for  constructing roads or acquir-
ing materials or within the time required for an environmental product declaration  provider
to prepare the environmental product declaration, but not later than  the date on which the
contractor completes performance of the public contract.
(c) The department may not use an environmental  product declaration as a consideration
in ranking or scoring a bid or proposal before January 1, 2027, but thereafter may  consider
environmental product declarations if the department determines  that doing so is beneficial
and if, after consulting with the  technical advisory committee, construction contractors,
Enrolled House Bill 4139 (HB 4139-B) Page 2
material suppliers and other stakeholders, the department devises  a scoring methodology
that ensures fairness among bidders and proposers.
(4)(a) In order to assist bidders or proposers to prepare or  submit environmental product
declarations required under this section, the  department by rule shall establish a program
to extend grants to bidders or  proposers that require financial assistance to prepare envi-
ronmental product declarations.
(b) Before establishing a program under this  subsection, the department shall submit a
request for funding to the Legislative Assembly in an amount that the department  estimates
would be necessary to provide the grants described in this subsection. The department  shall
deposit any funding the department receives  into a designated account within the
department’s operating account and shall keep records  of disbursements from the account.
Any moneys the department does not award as  grants must revert to the General Fund upon
the termination of the program.
(c) The department by rule shall establish criteria for eligibility  for grants under this
subsection and shall specify the maximum amount of each grant on the basis  of available
funding.
SECTION 2. (1) The  Department of Transportation shall establish a technical advisory
committee to assist the department with issues related to implementing the program  de-
scribed in section 1 of this 2022 Act.
(2) Members of the technical advisory committee must include,  but need not be limited
to, representatives from the Department of Transportation and the Department  of Environ-
mental Quality, from construction  firms engaged in transportation construction and main-
tenance, from  suppliers of covered materials, from construction and material supplier
industry associations, from workers  in construction or manufacturing industries, from en-
vironmental organizations and from institutions of higher education.
(3) The technical advisory committee shall:
(a) Recommend  quantities of covered materials below which the Department of Trans-
portation need not require an environmental product declaration.
(b) Advise the department as  needed to prepare the reports required under section 3 of
this 2022 Act.
(c) Advise and guide the department concerning:
(A) The extent to which environmental product declarations are available or are in  de-
velopment;
(B) Which of the department’s construction and maintenance activities  are appropriate
for inclusion in the program described in section 1 (2) of this 2022 Act;
(C) The time within which  a bidder or proposer must submit an environmental product
declaration and any related information;
(D) How to properly analyze or interpret an environmental product declaration;
(E) The content  of and criteria for devising, adopting and implementing the strategies
described in section 1 (2)(a)(C) of this 2022 Act;
(F) Potential changes to the design or implementation  of the program described in sec-
tion 1 of this 2022 Act in light of technological advances and the need to maintain  reasonable
competition for public contracts; and
(G) Other matters the technical advisory committee deems necessary to  achieve the
goals of the program.
(4) The technical advisory committee  may recommend to the department additional ma-
terials for designation as covered materials.
(5) A majority of the members of the technical advisory committee constitutes a quorum
for the transaction of business.
(6) The technical  advisory committee shall elect two of the members of the technical
advisory committee to serve as cochairpersons.
Enrolled House Bill 4139 (HB 4139-B) Page 3
(7) The department shall appoint a replacement for any vacancy on the technical advisory
committee. The replacement must become immediately effective upon appointment.
(8) The technical advisory committee must meet at least four times within each  calendar
year at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson, of  a majority of the mem-
bers of the technical advisory committee or of the Director of Transportation.
(9) The department shall provide staff support to the technical advisory committee.
(10) Members  of the technical advisory committee are not entitled to compensation or
reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the technical advisory committee.
SECTION 3.
The Department of Transportation, after establishing the program  described
in section 1 of this 2022 Act, shall report annually  not later than December 31 of each cal-
endar year to the  Oregon Transportation Commission and an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to  transportation concerning the progress of the program and
related matters.  The department shall prepare the reports in consultation with the technical
advisory committee and the reports, at a minimum, must include:
(1) A description of the department’s efforts to design  and implement the program, an
evaluation of the department’s success in reducing greenhouse gas emissions by means  of
environmental product declarations and recommendations as to  whether to continue or ex-
pand the program; and
(2) Any other matters the department, in consultation with the technical  advisory com-
mittee, deems relevant, material  or important to highlight or recommend to the commission
or the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 4. (1) The Medium and Heavy-Duty  Electrification Charging Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Medium and Heavy-Duty  Electrification Charging Fund must be credited to the Medium and
Heavy-Duty Electrification Charging Fund.
(2) Moneys in the Medium and Heavy-Duty Electrification Charging  Fund consist of
amounts donated to the fund, amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to  the fund by
the Legislative Assembly, other amounts deposited to the fund from any public or private
source and interest earned by the fund.
(3) Moneys in the Medium and Heavy-Duty Electrification  Charging Fund are contin-
uously appropriated to the Department of Environmental  Quality for a grant program to
support medium and heavy-duty zero  emission vehicle charging and fueling infrastructure
projects authorized under ORS 468.035.
(4) Not more than 10 percent of the  moneys in the Medium and Heavy-Duty
Electrification Charging Fund in each biennium may be expended to pay  the department’s
expenses, or the expenses of any other person the department hires or with which the de-
partment contracts, to administer the grant program.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (7), chapter 442, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ments from the United States  Department of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 442, Oregon Laws 2021, for special programs
is increased by $236,219 for greenhouse gas emissions analysis and reduction.
SECTION 6. This 2022 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4139 (HB 4139-B) Page 4
Passed by House March 2, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4139 (HB 4139-B) Page 5